District of Columbia statutes.
10-1012.01

Repealed

Master Public Facilities Plan.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806g-1
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-201, § 3, 57 DCR 4742
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of section 3 of Law 18-201 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan. Therefore, the provisions of this section, enacted by section 3 of Law 18-201, are not in effect.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 18-201 provided that section 3 shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.